District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.76b

Regulation of body artists.

(a)

The Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs, through the Board of Barber and Cosmetology, shall regulate body artists to protect public health, safety, and welfare, and to ensure that persons engaged in the occupation have the specialized skills, education, and training required to perform the services offered by:

(1)

Establishing and imposing occupational licensing, registration requirements, and associated fee schedules; and

(2)

Establishing rules within 180 days of [October 23, 2012].

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-193, § 3(g), 59 DCR 10388
This section was enacted as subsection (a), but has no subsection (b).